North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-15 Pharmacists

43-15-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Administration” means the direct application of a drug to the body of a patient. The term includes:

The emergency maintenance of a drug delivery device used in home infusion therapy by a qualified home pharmacist if nursing service is not available;

Immunization and vaccination by injection of an individual who is at least three years of age upon an order by a practitioner authorized to prescribe such a drug or by written protocol with a physician or nurse practitioner and subsequently reported as a childhood immunization and other information if required to the state’s immunization information system pursuant to section 23-01-05.3;

Provision of other drugs to an individual who is at least three years of age upon the order of a practitioner authorized to prescribe such a drug; and

Provision of drugs to an individual receiving emergency services in a health care facility upon an order or by established written protocol.

“Automated dispensing system” means a mechanical system that performs operations or activities, other than compounding or administration, relative to the storage, packaging, counting, labeling, and dispensing of medications and which collects, controls, and monitors all transaction information.

“Board” means the state board of pharmacy.

“Compounding” means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging, or labeling of a drug or device:

As the result of a practitioner’s prescription drug order or initiative based on the practitioner, patient, and pharmacist relationship in the course of professional practice; or

For the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale or dispensing.

“Confidential information” means individually identifiable health information maintained by the pharmacist in the patient’s records or which is communicated to the patient as part of a patient counseling.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer of a drug or device from one person to another, whether or not for a consideration.

“Device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or related article, including any component part or accessory, which is required under federal or North Dakota law to be prescribed by a practitioner and dispensed by a pharmacist.

“Dispense” or “dispensing” means the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug, pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or a nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.1 who is authorized by the practitioner to orally transmit the order that has been reduced to writing in the patient’s record, in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.

“Distribute” means the delivery of a drug other than by dispensing or administering.

“Drug” or “drugs” means:

Articles recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopeia, official national formulary, official homeopathic pharmacopeia, other drug compendium, or any supplement to any of them;

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animal;

Articles other than food intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals; and

Articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in subdivision a, b, or c.

“Drug regimen review” includes the following activities:

Evaluation of the prescription drug orders and patient records for:

Known allergies;

Rational therapy-contraindications;

Reasonable dose and route of administration; and

Reasonable directions for use.

Evaluation of the prescription drug orders and patient records for duplication of therapy.

Evaluation of the prescription drug orders and patient records for interactions:

Drug-drug;

Drug-food;

Drug-disease; and

Adverse drug reactions.

Evaluation of the prescription drug orders and patient records for proper utilization, including overutilization or underutilization, and optimum therapeutic outcomes.

“Emergency pharmacy practice” means in the event a pharmacist receives a request for a prescription refill and the pharmacist is unable to obtain refill authorization from the prescriber, the pharmacist may dispense and bill using a pharmacist national provider identifier a one-time emergency refill of up to a thirty-day supply of the prescribed medication, provided that:

The prescription is not for a controlled substance listed in schedule II;

The pharmaceutical is essential to the maintenance of life or to the continuation of therapy;

In the pharmacist’s professional judgment, the interruption of therapy might reasonably produce undesirable health consequences or may cause physical or mental discomfort;

The pharmacist properly records the dispensing; and

The dispensing pharmacist notifies the prescriber of the emergency dispensing within a reasonable time after the one-time emergency refill dispensing.

“Labeling” means the process of preparing and affixing of a label to any drug container exclusive, however, of the labeling by a manufacturer, packer, or distributor of a nonprescription drug or commercially packaged legend drug or device. Any label shall include all information required by federal and North Dakota law or regulation.

“Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a device or a drug, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substances or labeling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or compounding of a drug by an individual for the individual’s own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging, or labeling of a drug:

By a pharmacist or practitioner as an incident to dispensing or administering of a drug in the course of the person’s professional practice; or

By a practitioner or by the practitioner’s authorization under supervision for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

“Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the manufacture of drugs in facilities located within North Dakota.

“Medicine” means a drug or combination of drugs, used in treating disease in man or other animals.

“Nonprescription drugs” means medicines or drugs which may be sold without a prescription and which are prepackaged for use by the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the statutes and regulations of this state and the federal government.

“Original package” means the original carton, case, can, box, vial, bottle, or other receptacle, put up by the manufacturer or wholesaler or distributor, with label attached, making one complete package of the drug article.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, or any other legal entity.

“Pharmaceutical care” is the provision of drug therapy and other pharmaceutical patient care services intended to achieve outcomes related to the cure or prevention of a disease, elimination or reduction of a patient’s symptoms, or arresting or slowing of a disease process as defined in the rules of the board.

“Pharmacist” means a person to whom the board has issued a license to practice the profession of pharmacy whose license has not expired or been suspended.

“Pharmacy” or “drugstore” means every store or shop where drugs, medicines, or chemicals are dispensed, displayed for sale, or sold, at retail for medicinal purposes, or where prescriptions are compounded, and which is duly registered by the board.

“Pharmacy technician” means a person registered by the board who is employed by a pharmacy to assist licensed pharmacists in the practice of pharmacy by performing specific tasks delegated by and under the immediate personal supervision and control of a licensed pharmacist, as permitted by the board.

“Practice of pharmacy” means the interpretation, evaluation, and monitoring of prescription orders and patient drug therapy; the compounding, dispensing, labeling of drugs and devices except labeling by a manufacturer, packer, or distributor of nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend drugs and devices; the participation in drug selection, drug monitoring, drug administration, drug regimen review, the provision of these acts or services necessary as a primary health care provider of pharmaceutical care, and drug utilization evaluations; the proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and the maintenance of proper records for this storage; the responsibility for advising, consulting, and educating if necessary or if regulated, patients, public, and other health care providers on the rational, safe, and cost-effective use of drugs including therapeutic values, content, hazards, and appropriate use of drugs and devices; the participation in interpreting and applying pharmacokinetic data and other pertinent laboratory data to design safe and effective drug dosage regimens; if appropriate and if regulated, the participation in drug research either scientific or clinical as investigator or in collaboration with other investigators for the purposes of studying the effects of drugs on animals or human subjects, with other drugs or chemicals, and with drug delivery devices; emergency pharmacy practice; prescriptive practices as limited under this chapter; the performance of laboratory tests to provide pharmaceutical care services which are waived under the Federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act of 1988 [Pub. L. 100-578, section 2; 102 Stat. 2903; 42 U.S.C. 263 a et seq.], as amended; and the offering or performing of those acts, services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation, management, and control of pharmacy.

“Practitioner” means an individual licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by the jurisdiction in which the individual is practicing to prescribe drugs in the course of professional practice.

“Prescription” means any order for drugs or medical supplies, if such order is written or signed or transmitted by word of mouth, telephone, telegram, or other means of communication by a duly licensed physician, optometrist, dentist, veterinarian, or other practitioner, licensed by law to prescribe and administer such drugs or medical supplies intended to be filled, compounded, or dispensed by a pharmacist or any order for drugs or medical supplies transmitted orally by a nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.1 as written and signed by such a duly licensed physician, optometrist, dentist, veterinarian, or other practitioner.

“Prescription drug or legend drug” means a drug which, under federal law is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with one of the following:

“Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”;

“Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian”; or

Rx only;

“Public health issues” include immunizations, tobacco cessation, and other issues deemed appropriate by the board.

“Radiopharmaceutical service” means, but is not limited to, the compounding, dispensing, labeling, and delivery of radiopharmaceuticals; the participation in radiopharmaceutical selection and radiopharmaceutical utilization reviews; the proper and safe storage and distribution of radiopharmaceuticals; the maintenance of radiopharmaceutical quality assurance; the responsibility for advising, where necessary or where regulated, of therapeutic values, hazards, and use of radiopharmaceuticals; and the offering or performing of those acts, services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation, management, and control of radiopharmaceuticals.

“Wholesaler” means a person with facilities located in this state who buys for resale and distribution to persons other than consumers.

Compounding also includes the preparation of drugs or devices in anticipation of prescription drug orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns.

or a drug which is required by any applicable federal or North Dakota law or rule to be dispensed on prescription only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 476; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1501; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 86; 1979, ch. 465, § 3; 1981, ch. 443, § 1; 1991, ch. 456, § 1; 1991, ch. 457, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 423, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 405, § 1; 1995, ch. 406, § 1; 1997, ch. 371, § 1; 1999, ch. 378, § 1; 1999, ch. 379, § 4; 2001, ch. 213, § 8; 2001, ch. 375, § 1; 2003, ch. 211, § 21; 2007, ch. 363, § 1; 2011, ch. 310, § 1; 2019, ch. 350, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 312, § 1, effective March 23, 2021.

43-15-02.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following:

A duly licensed practitioner of medicine supplying the practitioner’s own patients with such remedies as the practitioner may desire.

The exclusive wholesale business of any dealer.

The keeping for sale and sale by general dealers of proprietary medicines in original packages and such simple household remedies as from time to time may be approved for such sale by the board.

Registered or copyrighted proprietary medicines.

The manufacture of proprietary remedies or the sale of the same in original packages by other than pharmacists.

A veterinary dispensing technician operating within a veterinary retail facility.

An individual licensed as a registered nurse under chapter 43-12.1, in the course of dispensing oral contraceptive pills, transdermal contraceptive patches, and vaginal contraceptive rings, pursuant to an order of an authorized prescriber, in the course of working in a Title X clinic.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 25; C.L. 1913, § 499; S.L. 1931, ch. 212, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1502; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 2; 2011, ch. 311, § 1; 2019, ch. 351, § 1, effective March 21, 2019.

43-15-03.
Board of pharmacy — Appointment.

The state board of pharmacy consists of seven members appointed by the governor. Five members of the board must be licensed pharmacists, one member must be a registered pharmacy technician, and one member must represent the public and may not be affiliated with any group or profession that provides or regulates any type of health care.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 284; R.C. 1899, § 284; R.C. 1905, § 303; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 477; R.C. 1943, § 43-1503; S.L. 1993, ch. 422, § 3; 2009, ch. 365, § 1.

43-15-04.
State board of pharmacy — Term of office — Vacancies.

The members of the board must be appointed for terms of five years each, with the terms of office so arranged that one term only expires on the eighth day of May of each year. Each member of the board shall qualify by taking the oath required of civil officers and shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified. The governor shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 4; R.C. 1895, § 284; R.C. 1899, § 284; R.C. 1905, § 303; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 3, 4; C.L. 1913, §§ 477, 478; R.C. 1943, § 43-1504.

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

43-15-05.
Compensation of board — Disposition of fees.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem of two hundred dollars for attendance at board meetings, and all actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending such meetings and in performing other official duties. The mileage and travel expense allowed may not exceed the amount provided for in section 54-06-09. All funds collected or received by the board must be deposited and disbursed in accordance with section 54-44-12.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 11; 1893, ch. 80, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 290; R.C. 1899, § 290; R.C. 1905, § 311; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 19; C.L. 1913, § 493; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 43-1505; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 2; 1971, ch. 510, § 9; 2007, ch. 363, § 2.

Cross-References.

Advances for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.2.

Claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.

Limitation on claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-03.

Per diem allowance for long-term travel, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.1.

43-15-06.
Organization of board.

At the first regular meeting of the board after the appointment and qualification of a new member for a full term, the board shall elect a president, a secretary, and a treasurer. The president must be chosen from the membership of the board, but any suitable person, whether a member of the board or not, may be chosen for the other offices. In case of the death, removal, resignation, absence, or refusal or inability to act of the president of the board, the senior member present shall act as president. In case of the death, removal, resignation, absence, or refusal or inability to act of the secretary or treasurer, the board may choose another person to act temporarily or for the remainder of the year. The president of the board of pharmacy shall preside at all meetings of the board and is responsible for the performance of all of the duties and functions of the board required or permitted by this chapter. Each additional officer elected by the board shall perform those duties normally associated with the officer’s position and such other duties assigned from time to time by the board.

The board shall employ a pharmacist to serve as a full-time employee of the board in the position of executive director. The executive director is responsible for the performance of the administrative functions of the board and such other duties as the board may direct. The executive director may also serve as secretary and treasurer of the board.

The executive director is authorized to sign on behalf of the board notices, complaints, statement of charges, stipulations, settlement agreements, findings of fact, conclusions of law, orders and decisions of the board without additional signatures of the president of the board or board members.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 5; 1893, ch. 80, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 285; R.C. 1899, § 285; R.C. 1905, § 304; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 5; C.L. 1913, § 479; R.C. 1943, § 43-1506; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 4; 1993, ch. 422, § 4.

43-15-07.
Officers of board — Bond — Duties — Compensation.

The secretary and treasurer of the board each must be bonded for the faithful discharge of their duties in the penal sum of not less than two thousand dollars. The president, secretary, and treasurer of the board shall perform such duties as the board may prescribe. Officers of the board may be allowed, in addition to their compensation as members of the board, such compensation as four-fifths of the members of the board agree upon.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 5; 1893, ch. 80, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 285; R.C. 1899, § 285; R.C. 1905, § 304; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 5; C.L. 1913, § 479; R.C. 1943, § 43-1507; S.L. 1975, ch. 258, § 22.

Cross-References.

Bonding of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-01-11, 44-01-12, and 44-01-14 and N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

43-15-08.
Oaths — President may administer.

The president of the board may administer oaths to applicants for registration and to any witness in hearings, investigations, or proceedings pending before the board.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 6, subs. f; C.L. 1913, § 480, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 43-1508.

43-15-09.
Meetings — When held — Notice — Quorum.

The board shall hold at least two and not more than four meetings in each calendar year for the examination of applicants for licensure. The board may hold such other meetings as may be necessary for the performance of its duties. A special meeting must be held at such time and place as a majority of the members agree upon, or may be called by the secretary, at the request of the president or any two members, by giving such notice to the members as the board may prescribe by its rules and regulations. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 5; 1893, ch. 80, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 285; R.C. 1899, § 285; R.C. 1905, § 304; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 5, 6; C.L. 1913, §§ 479, 480; R.C. 1943, § 43-1509; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 5; 1993, ch. 422, § 5.

43-15-10.
Powers of board. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In addition to other powers provided by law, the board shall have the following powers and duties, which shall be exercised in conformity with chapter 28-32 in order to protect the public health, welfare, and safety:

To place on probation, reprimand, or fine any pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician; or refuse to issue or renew, or suspend, revoke, restrict, or cancel, the license, permit, or registration of any pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician, if any of the following grounds apply and the pharmacy, pharmacist, or pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician:

Is addicted to any alcohol or drug habit.

Uses any advertising statements of a character tending to deceive or mislead the public.

Is subject to drug or alcohol dependency or abuse.

Permits or engages in the unauthorized sale of narcotic drugs or controlled substances.

Permits or engages an unauthorized person to practice pharmacy.

Is mentally or physically incompetent to handle pharmaceutical duties.

Is guilty of fraud, deception, or misrepresentation in passing the pharmacist examination.

Is found by the board in violation of any of the provisions of the laws regulating drugs, pharmacies, and pharmacists or interns and technicians or the rules and regulations established by the board.

Is found to have engaged in unprofessional conduct as that term is defined by the rules of the board.

Is subject to incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public.

Is found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of one or more of the following:

A felony, as defined by the statutes of North Dakota.

Any act involving moral turpitude or gross immorality.

Violations of the pharmacy or the drug laws of North Dakota or rules and regulations pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of any other state, or of the federal government.

Commits fraud or intentional misrepresentation in securing the issuance or renewal of a license or pharmacy permit.

Sells, dispenses, or compounds any drug while on duty and while under the influence of alcohol or while under the influence of a controlled substance without a practitioner’s prescription.

Discloses confidential information to any person, except as authorized by law.

To prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter governing the cancellation or suspension of a license.

To examine and license as pharmacist any applicant found entitled to such license.

To prescribe rules and regulations for the guidance of its members, officers, and employees, and to ensure the proper and orderly dispatch of its business.

To employ and pay such persons as it may deem necessary to inspect pharmacies in this state, investigate pharmacies for the information of the board, procure evidence in any proceeding pending before the board, or procure evidence in aid of any prosecution or action in any court commenced or about to be commenced by or against the board in relation to any matter in which the board has any duty to perform.

To employ and pay counsel to advise the board or to prosecute or defend any action or proceeding commenced by or against the board or pending before it.

To grant permits and renewals thereof for the establishment and operation of pharmacies.

Only for good cause to cancel, revoke, or suspend permits and renewals thereof for the establishment and operation of pharmacies.

To prescribe reasonable and nondiscriminatory rules and regulations in regard to granting, renewing, canceling, revoking, or suspending permits and renewals for establishing and operating pharmacies.

Action by the board canceling, revoking, suspending, or refusing to renew a permit to establish or operate a pharmacy shall not be enforced for thirty days after notice has been given an aggrieved party by the board, nor during the time that an appeal by such aggrieved party is pending and until such appeal is finally determined.

To prescribe reasonable rules and regulations relating to the physical design of space occupied by a pharmacy to ensure appropriate control of and safeguards over the contents of such pharmacy.

To regulate and control the practice of pharmacy in North Dakota.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules for the regulation of pharmacies and pharmacists providing radiopharmaceutical services, including special training, education, and experience for pharmacists and physical design of space, safeguards, and equipment for pharmacies.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules determined necessary by the board for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter, chapter 19-02.1 as that chapter pertains to drugs, subject to approval of the director of the state department of health, and chapter 19-03.1.

The board or its authorized representatives may investigate and gather evidence concerning alleged violations of the provisions of chapter 43-15, chapter 19-02.1 that pertains to drugs, chapters 19-03.1, 19-03.2, and 19-04, or of the rules of the board. Board investigative files are confidential and may not be considered public records or open records for purposes of section 44-04-18, until a complaint is filed or a decision made by the board not to file a complaint.

In addition to other remedies, the board may apply to the district court in the jurisdiction of an alleged violation, and that court has jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of chapter 43-15, chapter 19-02.1 pertaining to drugs, and chapter 19-03.1, whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law. Whenever a duly authorized representative of the board finds or has probable cause to believe that any drug or device is adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, within the meaning of chapter 19-02.1, the representative shall affix to that drug or device a tag or other appropriate marking giving notice that the article is or is suspected of being adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, has been detained or embargoed and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until provision for removal or disposal is given by the board or its agents or the court. No person may remove or dispose of such embargoed drug or device by sale or otherwise without the permission of the board or its agent, or, after summary proceedings have been instituted, without permission from the court.

When a drug or device detained or embargoed has been declared by such representative to be adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, the board shall, as soon as practical thereafter, petition the district court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for an order for condemnation of such article. If the judge determines that the drug or device so detained or embargoed is not adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, the board shall direct the immediate removal of the tag or other marking. If the court finds the detained or embargoed drug or device is adulterated, misbranded, mislabeled, or improperly identified, such drug or device, after entry of the decree, shall be destroyed at the expense of the owner under the supervision of a board representative and all court costs and fees, storage, and other proper expense shall be borne by the owner of such drug or device. When the adulteration, misbranding, mislabeling, or improper identification can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the drug or device, the court, after entry of the decree and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond has been posted, may direct that such drug or device be delivered to the owner for labeling or processing under the supervision of a board representative. Expense of supervision shall be paid by the owner. Bond posted shall be returned to the owner of the drug or device on representation to the court by the board that the drug or device is no longer in violation of the embargo and the expense of supervision has been paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the board to report violations whenever the board believes the public’s interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

The board shall establish a bill of rights for patients concerning the health care services a patient may expect in regard to pharmaceutical care.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules as may be deemed necessary by the board to register pharmacy technicians pursuant to qualifications established by the board, to charge a pharmacy technician an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars, to specify tasks associated with and included in the practice of pharmacy which may be delegated by a licensed pharmacist to a registered pharmacy technician, to provide for suspension or revocation of a pharmacy technician’s registration, and to regulate and control pharmacy technicians. The board may allocate up to fifty percent of the amount of the registration fee to an appropriate pharmacy technician association for its general operating expenses, including pharmacy technician education and development standards.

To require the self-reporting by an applicant or a licensee of any information the board determines may indicate possible deficiencies in practice, performance, fitness, or qualifications.

To require information regarding an applicant’s or licensee’s fitness, qualifications, and previous professional record and performance from recognized data sources, including the national association of boards of pharmacy data bank, other data repositories, licensing and disciplinary authorities of other jurisdictions, professional education and training institutions, liability insurers, health care institutions, and law enforcement agencies be reported to the board. The board may require an applicant for licensure or a licensee who is the subject of a disciplinary investigation to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12-60-24. All costs associated with obtaining a background check are the responsibility of the licensee or applicant.

To adopt, amend, and repeal rules as may be deemed necessary by the board to register veterinary dispensing technicians pursuant to qualifications established by the board, to charge a veterinary dispensing technician an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars, to provide for suspension or revocation of a veterinary dispensing technician’s registration, to provide for suspension or revocation of a veterinary retail facility’s license, to regulate and control veterinary retail facilities, and to regulate and control veterinary dispensing technicians.

To establish limited prescriptive authority for individuals to distribute opioid antagonist kits, also known as “Naloxone rescue kits.” If the board establishes limited prescriptive authority under this subsection, the board shall adopt rules to establish standards that may include training, certification, and continuing education requirements.

To establish limited prescriptive authority through a statewide protocol for public health issues within the scope of practice for a pharmacist. The board shall adopt rules to establish standards of care.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 108, § 5; 1893, ch. 80, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 285; R.C. 1899, § 285; R.C. 1905, § 304; S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 6, 7; C.L. 1913, §§ 480, 481; S.L. 1937, ch. 193, §§ 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 43-1510; S.L. 1959, ch. 322, § 6; S.L. 1971, ch. 436, § 1; 1979, ch. 467, § 1; 1981, ch. 444, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 479, § 1; 1987, ch. 518, § 1; 1987, ch. 519, § 1; 1989, ch. 316, § 3; 1993, ch. 422, §§ 6, 7; 1995, ch. 217, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 405, § 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 22; 2007, ch. 363, § 3; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2011, ch. 311, § 2; 2015, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 312, § 2, effective March 23, 2021.

Section 43-15-10 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 360 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 2 of Chapter 312, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2221.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.